Alaska, session 34, HB311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 28.10.181 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (pp) Special request plates commemorating the 250th anniversary of the 06 United States of America. Upon application by the owner of a motor vehicle, the 07 department may issue registration plates commemorating the 250th anniversary of the 08 United States of America. The commissioner shall determine the design and color of 09 the plates. The department may disapprove the issuance of registration plates under 10 this subsection when the requested plates are a duplication of an existing registration. 11 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.